District of Columbia statutes.
49-105

Parades to have right-of-way.

The United States forces or troops, or any portion of the militia, parading, or performing any duty according to law, shall have the right-of-way in any street or highway through which they may pass; provided, that the carriage of the United States mails, the legitimate functions of the police, and the progress and operations of fire engines and fire departments shall not be interfered with thereby.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 779, ch. 328, § 47
renumbered Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 50
1981 Ed., § 39-605.
1973 Ed., § 39-605.